Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.48.070

Malicious mischief in the first degree.

(1) A person is guilty of malicious mischief in the first degree if he or she knowingly and maliciously:

(a) Causes physical damage to the property of another in an amount exceeding five thousand dollars;

(b) Causes an interruption or impairment of service rendered to the public by physically damaging or tampering with an emergency vehicle or property of the state, a political subdivision thereof, or a public utility or mode of public transportation, power, or communication;

(c) Causes an impairment of the safety, efficiency, or operation of an aircraft by physically damaging or tampering with the aircraft or aircraft equipment, fuel, lubricant, or parts; or

(d) Causes an interruption or impairment of service rendered to the public by, without lawful authority, physically damaging, destroying, or removing an official ballot deposit box or ballot drop box or, without lawful authority, damaging, destroying, removing, or tampering with the contents thereof.

(2) Malicious mischief in the first degree is a class B felony.

[ 2017 c 283 s 1; 2009 c 431 s 4; 1983 1st ex.s. c 4 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.48.070.]

NOTES:

Applicability—2009 c 431: See note following RCW 4.24.230.

Severability—1983 1st ex.s. c 4: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1983 1st ex.s. c 4 s 6.]

Property crime database, liability: RCW 4.24.340.